Missouri, session 2026, HB3030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.227, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 191.227, to read as follows:
191.227. 1. All physicians, chiropractors, hospitals, dentists, and other duly licensed
practitioners in this state, herein called "providers", shall, upon written request of a patient, or
guardian or legally authorized representative of a patient, furnish a copy of his or her record
of that patient's health history and treatment rendered to the person submitting a written
request, except that such right shall be limited to access consistent with the patient's condition
and sound therapeutic treatment as determined by the provider. Beginning August 28, 1994,
such record shall be furnished within a reasonable time of the receipt of the request therefor
and upon payment of a fee as provided in this section.
2. Health care providers may condition the furnishing of the patient's health care
records to the patient, the patient's authorized representative or any other person or entity
authorized by law to obtain or reproduce such records upon payment of a fee for:
(1) (a) Search and retrieval, in an amount not more than twenty-four dollars and
eighty-five cents plus copying in the amount of fifty-seven cents per page for the cost of
supplies and labor plus, if the health care provider has contracted for off-site records storage
and management, any additional labor costs of outside storage retrieval, not to exceed twenty-
three dollars and twenty-six cents, as adjusted annually pursuant to subsection 6 of this
section; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3030 2
(b) The records shall be furnished electronically upon payment of the search,
retrieval, and copying fees set under this section at the time of the request or one hundred
eight dollars and eighty-eight cents total, whichever is less, if such person:
a. Requests health records to be delivered electronically in a format of the health care
provider's choice;
b. The health care provider stores such records completely in an electronic health
record; and
c. The health care provider is capable of providing the requested records and
affidavit, if requested, in an electronic format;
(2) Postage, to include packaging and delivery cost;
(3) Notary fee, not to exceed two dollars, if requested.

Such fee shall be the fee in effect on February 1, 2018, increased or decreased annually under
this section.
3. For purposes of subsections 1 and 2 of this section, "a copy of his or her record of
that patient's health history and treatment rendered" or "the patient's health care records"
includes a statement or record that no such health history or treatment record responsive to the
request exists.
4. Notwithstanding provisions of this section to the contrary, providers may charge
for the reasonable cost of all duplications of health care record material or information which
cannot routinely be copied or duplicated on a standard commercial photocopy machine.
5. The transfer of the patient's record done in good faith shall not render the provider
liable to the patient or any other person for any consequences which resulted or may result
from disclosure of the patient's record as required by this section.
6. Effective February first of each year, the fees listed in subsection 2 of this section
shall be increased or decreased annually based on the annual percentage change in the
unadjusted, U.S. city average, annual average inflation rate of the medical care component of
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U). The current reference base of
the index, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor, shall be used as the reference base. For purposes of this subsection, the annual average
inflation rate shall be based on a twelve-month calendar year beginning in January and ending
in December of each preceding calendar year. The department of health and senior services
shall report the annual adjustment and the adjusted fees authorized in this section on the
department's internet website by February first of each year.
7. A health care provider may disclose a deceased patient's health care records or
payment records to the executor or administrator of the deceased person's estate, or pursuant
to a valid, unrevoked power of attorney for health care that specifically directs that the

HB 3030 3
deceased person's health care records be released to the agent after death. If an executor,
administrator, or agent has not been appointed, the deceased prior to death did not specifically
object to disclosure of his or her records in writing, and such disclosure is not inconsistent
with any prior expressed preference of the deceased that is known to the health care provider,
a deceased patient's health care records may be released upon written request of a person who
is deemed as the personal representative of the deceased person under this subsection.
Priority shall be given to the deceased patient's spouse and the records shall be released on the
affidavit of the surviving spouse that he or she is the surviving spouse. If there is no surviving
spouse, the health care records may be released to one of the following persons:
(1) The acting trustee of a trust created by the deceased patient either alone or with
the deceased patient's spouse;
(2) An adult child of the deceased patient on the affidavit of the adult child that he or
she is the adult child of the deceased;
(3) A parent of the deceased patient on the affidavit of the parent that he or she is the
parent of the deceased;
(4) An adult brother or sister of the deceased patient on the affidavit of the adult
brother or sister that he or she is the adult brother or sister of the deceased;
(5) A guardian or conservator of the deceased patient at the time of the patient's death
on the affidavit of the guardian or conservator that he or she is the guardian or conservator of
the deceased; or
(6) A guardian ad litem of the deceased's minor child based on the affidavit of the
guardian that he or she is the guardian ad litem of the minor child of the deceased.
8. (1) Records containing a patient's health history and treatment created by an
emergency care provider, as defined in section 191.630, or a telecommunicator first
responder, as defined in section 650.320, in the course of the provider's or responder's official
duties while responding to a formal request for assistance shall be made available, upon
written request, to any person authorized to obtain the patient's health care records under the
provisions of this section, or in response to a subpoena or court order.
(2) The furnishing of health care records under this subsection may be conditioned
upon the payment of a fee in an amount equal to the fee allowed for the furnishing of any
other health care record under this section.
(3) Personal health information, including patient health history and treatment, shall
not be considered a public record, as described under chapter 610. Nothing in this section
shall limit the release of information or public records with personal health information that is
redacted regarding the general nature of the event.

HB 3030 4
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the release of information to facilitate the
normal delivery of patient care or to evaluate the quality of care as part of an established
quality improvement program.
9. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, a health care
provider or health care facility shall not charge a fee for medical or mental health
records requested by a patient, former patient, or attorney or other authorized
representative of a patient or former patient for use in supporting an application for
benefits under:
(1) Chapter 287;
(2) 42 U.S.C. Section 401 et seq.;
100 (3) 42 U.S.C. Section 1382 et seq.;
101 (4) 42 U.S.C. Section 1395 et seq.;
102 (5) 38 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.; or
103 (6) 38 U.S.C. Section 1501 et seq.
104
105 The health care provider or health care facility may provide the records in the form that
106 is most cost-effective, provided that records provided electronically shall be produced in
107 a universally accessible format.
✔